Utah statutes.
73-3b-301.   Storage account -- Monitoring and reporting required.

(1)  The state engineer shall establish a storage account for each groundwater recharge and recovery project for which a permit has been issued.

(2)  In accordance with specifications of the state engineer, any person holding a groundwater recharge or recovery permit shall:

(a)  monitor the operation of the project and its impact on land, the groundwater aquifer, and water rights within the project's area of hydrologic impact; and

(b)  file reports with the state engineer regarding:

(i)  the quantity of water stored and recovered; and

(ii)  the water quality of the recharged water, receiving aquifer, and recovered water.



Enacted by Chapter 146, 1991 General Session

